California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) In order to more accurately determine the mobility and persistence of the pesticides identified in the Groundwater Protection List, and to determine if these pesticides have migrated to groundwaters of the state, the director shall conduct soil and groundwater monitoring statewide in areas of the state where the pesticide is primarily used or where other factors identified pursuant to Section 13143 and the Groundwater Protection List, including physicochemical characteristics and use practices of the pesticides, indicate a probability that the pesticide may migrate to the groundwaters of the state. The department shall monitor for the active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product
 of the pesticide listed in the Groundwater Protection List. The monitoring shall commence within one year after the pesticide is placed on the Groundwater Protection List and shall be conducted in accordance with standard protocol and testing procedures established pursuant to subdivision (b). Monitoring programs shall replicate conditions under which the pesticide is normally used in the area of monitoring. In developing a monitoring program, the director shall coordinate with other agencies that conduct soil and groundwater monitoring.

(b) Within 90 days after a pesticide is placed on the Groundwater Protection List pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13145, the director, in consultation with the board, shall develop a standard protocol and testing procedure for each pesticide identified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13145.

(c) The director shall report all monitoring results to the State Department of Public Health and the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 4.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13149.

(a) Within 90 days after the active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of a pesticide is detected under any of the conditions listed in paragraph (1) or (2), the director shall determine whether the detection resulted from agricultural use in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations, and shall state in writing the reasons for the determination.

(1) An active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of a pesticide has been found at or below the deepest of the following depths:

(A) Eight feet below the soil surface.

(B) Below the root zone of the crop where the active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product was found.

(C) Below the soil microbial zone.

(2) An active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of a pesticide has been found in the groundwaters of the state.

(b) Upon a determination by the director that a pesticide meets any of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) as a result of agricultural use in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations, the director shall immediately notify the registrant of the determination and of the registrant’s opportunity to request a hearing pursuant
 to subdivision (c).

(c) Any pesticide that meets any of the conditions in subdivision (b) shall be subject to Section 13150 if the registrant of the pesticide requests, within 30 days after the notice is issued, that the subcommittee conduct a hearing, as described in Section 13150. Notwithstanding any other law, if the registrant does not request the hearing within 30 days after the notice is issued, the director shall cancel the registration of the pesticide.

(d) For purposes of this section, any finding of a pesticide shall result from either an analytical method approved by the department that provides unequivocal identification of a chemical, such as mass spectroscopy, or from verification, within 30 days, by a second analytical method or a second analytical laboratory approved
 by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 5.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13150.

The director may allow the continued registration, sale, and use of a pesticide that meets any one of the conditions specified in Section 13149 if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The registrant submits a report and documented evidence that demonstrate both of the following:

(1) That the presence in the soil of any active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product does not threaten to pollute the groundwater of the state in any region within the state in which the pesticide may be used according to the terms under which it is registered.

(2) That any active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product that has been found in groundwater has not polluted, and does not threaten to pollute, the groundwater of the state in any region within the state in which the pesticide may be used according to the terms under which it is registered.

(b) A subcommittee of the director’s pesticide registration and evaluation committee, consisting of one member each representing the director, the State Department of Health Services, and the board, holds a hearing, within 180 days after it is requested by the registrant, to review the report and documented evidence submitted by the registrant and any other information or data that the subcommittee determines is necessary to make a finding.

(c) The subcommittee, within 90 days after the hearing is conducted, makes any of the following findings and recommendations:

(1) That the ingredient found in the soil or groundwater has not polluted, and does not threaten to pollute, the groundwater of the state.

(2) That the agricultural use of the pesticide can be modified so that there is a high probability that the pesticide would not pollute the groundwater of the state.

(3) That modification of the agricultural use of the pesticide pursuant to paragraph (2) or cancellation of the pesticide will cause severe economic hardship on the state’s agricultural industry, and that no alternative products or practices can be effectively used so that there is a high probability that pollution of the groundwater of the state will not occur. The subcommittee shall recommend a level of the pesticide that does not significantly diminish the margin of safety recognized by the subcommittee to not cause adverse health effects.

When the subcommittee makes a finding pursuant to paragraph (2) or this paragraph (3), it shall determine whether the adverse health effects of the pesticide are carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or neurotoxic.

(d) The director, within 30 days after the subcommittee issues its findings, does any of the following:

(1) Concurs with the subcommittee finding pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). 

(2) Concurs with the subcommittee finding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and adopts modifications that result in a high probability that the pesticide would not pollute the groundwaters of the state.

(3) Concurs with the subcommittee findings pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), or determines that the subcommittee finding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) will cause severe economic hardship on the state’s agricultural industry. In either case, the director shall adopt the subcommittee’s recommended level or shall establish a different level, provided the level does not significantly diminish the margin of safety to not cause adverse health effects. 

(4) Determines that, contrary to the finding of the subcommittee, no pollution or threat to pollution exists. The director shall state the reasons for his or her decisions in writing at the time any action is taken, specifying any differences with the subcommittee’s findings and recommendations. The written statement shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the Senate and Assembly, the State Department of Health Services, and the board. 

When the director takes action pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3), he or she shall determine whether the adverse health effects of the pesticide are carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or neurotoxic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.

Any pesticide identified pursuant to Section 13149 that fails to meet any of the conditions of Section 13150 shall be canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13152.

(a) (1) The department shall conduct ongoing soil and groundwater monitoring of any pesticide whose continued use is permitted following the issuance of findings by the director pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13150. The department shall continuously review new science and data that could impact the validity of a finding that a pesticide reviewed pursuant to Section 13150 has not polluted and does not threaten to pollute the groundwater of the state.

(2) If the department determines that there is new science or data that could impact the validity of a finding described in paragraph (1), the director shall either mitigate
 the threat presented by the pollution or subject the pesticide again to the Section 13150 review process.

(b) Any pesticide monitored pursuant to this section that is determined, by review of monitoring data and any other relevant data, to pollute the groundwaters of the state two years after the director takes action pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 13150 shall be canceled unless the director has determined that the adverse health effects of the pesticide are not carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or neurotoxic.

(c) The department shall maintain a statewide database of wells sampled for pesticide active ingredients. All agencies shall submit to
 the department, in a timely manner, the results of any well sampling for pesticide active ingredients and the results of any well sampling that detect any pesticide active ingredients.

(d) Not later than June 30, 1986, the director, the State Department of Public Health, and the board shall jointly establish minimum requirements for well sampling that will ensure precise and accurate results. The requirements shall be distributed to all agencies that conduct well sampling. All well sampling conducted after December 1, 1986, shall meet the minimum requirements established pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The department shall post the following information on its Internet Web site, updated no later than December 1 of each year:

(1) The number of wells sampled for pesticide active ingredients, the location of the wells from which the samples were taken, the well numbers, if available, and the agencies responsible for drawing and analyzing the samples.

(2) The number of well samples with detectable levels of pesticide active ingredients, the location of the wells from which the samples were taken, the well numbers, if available, and the agencies responsible for drawing and analyzing the samples.

(3) An analysis of the results of well sampling described in paragraphs (1) and (2), to determine the probable source of the residues. The analysis shall consider factors such as the physical and chemical characteristics of the pesticide, volume of use and method of application of the pesticide, irrigation
 practices related to use of the pesticide, and types of soil in areas where the pesticide is applied.

(4) Actions taken by the director and the board to prevent pesticides from migrating to groundwaters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 6.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. The Interim Data Gap Exemption for Qualified Federally Registered Pesticides [13161. - 13170.]

13161.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Feasible alternative” means other chemical or nonchemical procedures that can reasonably accomplish the same pest control function as existing procedures with comparable effectiveness and reliability, taking into account economic, environmental, sociological, technological, and ecological factors, including impact on beneficial and other nontarget organisms, pest resistance to pesticides, and timeliness of control.

(b) “Pest management system” means a systematic approach to pest control that stresses the application of biological and cultural pest control techniques with the selective use of pesticides when necessary to achieve acceptable levels of control with the least possible harm to nontarget organisms and the environment as described in subdivision (f) of Section 11501.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13162.

The director may issue a certificate of interim registration allowing the sale and use of a pesticide that otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The certificate stipulates which of the California data requirements listed in Section 13163 are being deferred for completion during the time of interim registration.

(b) The certificate stipulates a period of time, not to exceed three years, for each deferral determined by the director as reasonably sufficient for the generation, submission, and review of the data.

(c) The certificate stipulates any limitations on the use of the pesticide that the director may deem appropriate pursuant to Section 13166 or on the sale of the pesticide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13163.

In granting a certificate of interim registration, the director may defer no more than three of the following registration data requirements:

(a) Efficacy studies pursuant to Section 12824.

(b) KOW (octanol water partition coefficient) pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13143.

(c) Soil photolysis pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 13143.

(d) A field dissipation study pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 13143.

(e) A study pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13143 that will be redone to correct errors or a study conducted under California conditions or guidelines, if the weight of evidence from all other submitted data support a scientific judgment in favor of interim registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13164.

Consistent with the limitations of Section 13163, a registrant or a user group of any pesticide registered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency may apply for a California certificate of interim registration if the applicant does all of the following:

(a) The applicant provides information that the product would fill a need and significantly enhance a systems approach to pest management during the period the applicant completes requirements for a full California registration. Additionally, the information supporting an interim registration shall be based upon one or more of the following conclusions that the product will:

(1) Reduce risks to the public health, the pesticide workplace, or the environment by reducing the overall use of chemical controls within a pest management system.

(2) Reduce risks to the public health, the pesticide workplace, or the environment by providing a more benign alternative to an existing use pattern.

(3) Reduce risks of pest resistance problems such as loss of economic efficacy and increased amounts or frequency of chemical applications by providing better integrated management of a pest or pest complex.

(4) Reduce a substantial economic hardship to a segment of California’s agricultural industry due to a pest infestation for which there is no other feasible alternative.

(b) The applicant provides the director with all data that is required to support the federal and California registrations of the pesticide product, except the data which may be deferred pursuant to Section 13163, and any other available data that the director may deem appropriate.

(c) The applicant makes a commitment to generate all data required in California for a full certificate of registration within a reasonable period of time to be determined by the director and reflected in the certificate of interim registration. The written commitment shall identify the developing party or parties for each deferred data requirement within 90 days of the issuance of the certificate of interim registration and identify a schedule of quarterly progress reports that will be submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13165.

Notwithstanding Section 13163, the director shall not grant a certificate of interim registration unless he or she consults with the Pesticide Registration and Evaluation Committee on the proposed interim registration, and makes a written finding, after consultation, declaring all of the following:

(a) That the pesticide is needed and will be a significant component of a pest management system as demonstrated by the applicant pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13164.

(b) That the interim use of the pesticide, in conformance with the limitations established by the director pursuant to Section 13166, is not expected to cause any significant adverse effect on the public health, the safety of the pesticide workplace, or the environment, including a finding that the pesticide does not threaten to pollute the groundwater of the state.

(c) That the weight of evidence supports a scientific judgment in favor of interim registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13166.

The director shall limit the use of any pesticide granted a certificate of interim registration to specific uses within a pest management system meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 13164. The director may place additional restrictions on the use of any pesticide granted a certificate of interim registration, including, but not limited to, requiring a restricted material permit or the written recommendation of a specially trained pest control advisor or specially trained certified private applicator, or limiting the quantity, area, and manner of application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13167.

The director shall revoke or refuse to renew a certificate of interim registration at any time that he or she finds that the interim registration no longer meets all the requirements of this article, including the registrant’s failure to submit a progress report for any deferred study, a failure to show in the report that a good faith effort to complete an acceptable study is making satisfactory progress, or the period of time from the issuance of the certificate has exceeded the three year limit set forth in Section 13162. The director shall provide the registrant with the basis for the decision in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13168.

The director may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13169.

To the extent that this article conflicts with other provisions in Article 15 of this chapter, this article shall prevail. Unless otherwise specified in this article, a certificate of interim registration shall be subject to all other provisions governing certificates of registration in Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) and this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13170.

The department shall impose a fee in an amount sufficient to cover the department’s costs of reviewing and processing the application on any person who applies for a certificate of interim registration pursuant to this article. Fee revenue shall be deposited in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to offset the department’s costs to process and review these applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 963, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Healthy Schools Act of 2000 [13180. - 13188.]

13180.

This article, Article 4 (commencing with Section 17608) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.5 of the Education Code, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 105500) of Chapter 7 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Schools Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13181.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this article, “integrated pest management” means a pest management strategy that focuses on long-term prevention or suppression of pest problems through a combination of techniques such as monitoring for pest presence and establishing treatment threshold levels, using nonchemical practices to make the habitat less conducive to pest development, improving sanitation, and employing mechanical and physical controls. Pesticides that pose the least possible hazard and are effective in a manner that minimizes risks to people, property, and the environment, are used only after careful monitoring indicates they are needed according to preestablished guidelines
 and treatment thresholds. This definition shall apply only to integrated pest management at school facilities and child day care facilities.

(b) For purposes of this article “IPM coordinator” has the same meaning as school designee or IPM coordinator, as those terms are defined in subdivision (e) of Section 17609 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 10.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13182.

It is the policy of the state that effective least toxic pest management practices should be the preferred method of managing pests at schoolsites and that the state, in order to reduce children’s exposure to toxic pesticides, shall take the necessary steps, pursuant to this article, to facilitate the adoption of effective least toxic pest management practices at schoolsites. It is the intent of the Legislature that all school personnel involved in the application of pesticides at a schoolsite be trained in integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 11.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13183.

(a) The department shall promote and facilitate the voluntary adoption of integrated pest management programs for schoolsites, excluding privately operated child day care facilities, as defined in Section 1596.750 of the Health and Safety Code, that voluntarily choose to do so. For these schoolsites, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish an integrated pest management program for schoolsites consistent with Section 13181. In establishing the program, the department shall:

(A) Develop criteria for identifying least-hazardous pest control practices and encourage
 their adoption as part of an integrated pest management program at each schoolsite.

(B) Develop a model program guidebook that prescribes essential program elements for schoolsites that have adopted a least-hazardous integrated pest management program. At a minimum, this guidebook shall include guidance on all of the following:

(i) Adopting an IPM policy.

(ii) Selecting and training an IPM coordinator.

(iii) Identifying and monitoring pest populations and damage.

(iv) Establishing a community-based school district advisory committee.

(v) Developing a pest management plan for making least-hazardous pest control choices.

(vi) Contracting for integrated pest management services.

(vii) Training and licensing opportunities.

(viii) Establishing a community-based right-to-know standard for notification and posting of pesticide applications.

(ix) Recordkeeping and program review.

(C) Develop a template for an integrated pest management plan to be used by schoolsites or school districts. The template shall outline a strategy for integrated pest management as described in Section 13181.

(2) Make the model program guidebook available to schoolsites and establish a process for systematically updating the guidebook and supporting documentation.

(b) The department shall promote and facilitate the voluntary adoption of integrated pest management programs at child day care facilities, as defined in Section 1596.750 of the Health and Safety Code, through the following:

(1) Modifying the department’s existing integrated pest management program for schoolsites as described in subdivision (a) of Section 13183 for the child day care setting.

(2) Creating or modifying existing educational and informational materials on integrated pest management for the child day care setting.

(3) Making the materials available to child day care facilities and establishing a process for systematically updating them. 

(c) The department shall develop a training course to train any person who intends to apply pesticides on a schoolsite. The training course shall cover integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health. The training course shall be provided by the department or an agent authorized by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 12.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13184.

(a) In implementing Section 13183, the department shall establish and maintain an Internet Web site as a comprehensive directory of resources describing and promoting least-hazardous practices at schoolsites. The Web site shall also make available an electronic copy of the model program guidebook, its updates, and supporting documentation. The department shall also establish and maintain on its Web site an easily identified link that provides the public with all appropriate information regarding the public health and environmental impacts of pesticide active ingredients and ways to reduce the use of pesticides at school facilities.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
 state assist school districts to ensure that compliance with Section 17612 of the Education Code is simple and inexpensive. The department shall include in its Web site Internet-based links that allow schools to properly identify and list the active ingredients of pesticide products they expect to be applied during the upcoming year. Use of these links by schools is not mandatory but shall be made available to all schools at no cost. The department shall ensure that adequate resources are available to respond to inquiries from school facilities or districts regarding the use of integrated pest management practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 106.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13185.

(a) The department shall establish an integrated pest management training program in order to facilitate the adoption of a model IPM program and least-hazardous pest control practices by schoolsites. In establishing the IPM training program, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt a “train-the-trainer” approach, whenever feasible, to rapidly and broadly disseminate program information.

(2) Develop curricula and promote ongoing training efforts in cooperation with the University of California and the California State University.

(3) Prioritize outreach on a regional basis first and then to school districts. For outreach to child day care facilities, the department shall participate in existing trainings that provide opportunities for disseminating program information broadly on a regional basis.

(b) Nothing in this article shall preclude a schoolsite from adopting stricter pesticide use policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 865, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13186.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Pesticide Regulation, pursuant to Section 12979 of the Food and Agricultural Code and Sections 6624 and 6627 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, requires persons engaged for hire in the business of pest control to maintain records of pesticide use and report a summary of that pesticide use to the county agricultural commissioner or director. The Legislature further finds and declares that it is in the interest of the state, in implementing a school integrated pest management program pursuant to this article, to collect specified information on the use of pesticides at schoolsites.

(b) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall prepare a school pesticide use form to be used by licensed and certified pest control operators when they apply any pesticides at a schoolsite. The form shall include, for each application at a schoolsite, the name and address of the schoolsite, date and location of application, pesticide product name, and the quantity of pesticide used. Nothing in this section shall change any existing applicable pesticide use reporting requirements.

(c) Persons who are required to submit pesticide use records to the county agricultural commissioner or director shall complete and submit to the director the school pesticide use forms established pursuant to this section. The forms shall be submitted annually and may be submitted more often at the discretion of the pest control operator maintaining the forms. Child day care facilities, excluding family day care homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, which are subject to the Healthy Schools Act of 2000, shall inform contractors hired to apply pesticides at the schoolsite that the facility must comply with the Healthy Schools Act of 2000.

(d) Any person who is hired to apply pesticides at a child day care facility, excluding family day care homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, shall provide that facility’s school designee with all of the following information at least 120 hours in advance of any pesticide application, except in the case of an emergency condition, as defined in Section 17609 of the Education Code:

(1) The pesticide product name.

(2) The pesticide manufacturer’s name.

(3) The United States Environmental Protection Agency’s product registration number.

(4) The active ingredient or ingredients in the pesticide product.

(5) The areas of application.

(6) The intended date of application.

(7) The reason for the pesticide application.

(e) If a person hired to apply pesticides contracts directly with the property owner or his or her agent rather than directly with the child day care facility, excluding family day care homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, the property owner or his or her agent must notify the contractor that a child day care facility is being operated on the property at which the pesticides are to be applied to enable the contractor to comply with subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 865, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13186.5.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2016, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a school designee, as defined in Section 17609 of the Education Code, and any person, including, but not necessarily limited to, a schoolsite or school district employee, who, in the course of his or her work, intends to apply a pesticide at a schoolsite subject to this article, shall annually complete a training course provided by the department or an agent authorized by the department. The training course shall include integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2016, any person hired to apply a pesticide at a
 schoolsite subject to this article shall complete at least a one-hour training course in integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health before applying pesticides at a schoolsite subject to this article and during each subsequent licensing period in which the person applies a pesticide at a schoolsite subject to this article. The training course may be applied to his or her professional continuing education requirement required by the Structural Pest Control Board or the department.

(2) The training course required by paragraph (1) shall be developed by the department and may also be developed by a provider approved by the Structural Pest Control Board if the training course has been approved by the department.

(3) The department shall ensure that the training course it develops or approves pursuant
 to paragraph (2) meets the requirements for continuing education credit required by the Structural Pest Control Board and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 175.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13187.

Sections 13186 and 13186.5 shall not apply to any agency signatory to a cooperative agreement with the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 116180 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 14.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13188.

The Director of Pesticide Regulation may adopt regulations to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17.5. Pesticide Use Near Schoolsites [13189. - 13189.6.]

13189.

For purposes of this article, “schoolsite” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6690 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.1.

To enable accurate reporting and enforcement of Sections 6690 to 6692, inclusive, of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Require a separate site identification number for the portion of an agricultural field that lies within one-quarter mile of a schoolsite.

(b) For a permit application for agricultural use of a pesticide designated as a restricted material, as it pertains to an agricultural field of which any portion lies within one-quarter mile of a schoolsite, require reporting on the specific anticipated method of applying
 the pesticide as specified in Section 6691 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) For a notice of intent for use of a pesticide designated as a restricted material, as it pertains to an agricultural field of which any portion lies within one-quarter mile of a schoolsite, require reporting on both of the following:

 (1) The specific method of applying the pesticide as specified in Section 6691 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The allowable dates and times of the period during which the pesticide is to be applied.

(d) For pesticide use reporting forms and procedures, as they pertain to an
 agricultural field of which any portion lies within one-quarter mile of a schoolsite, require reporting on both of the following:

(1) The specific method of applying the pesticide as specified in Section 6691 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The exact date and time of the start and the end of the pesticide application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.2.

In evaluating a county’s pesticide use enforcement program, the director shall evaluate the county’s effectiveness in enforcing Sections 6690 to 6692, inclusive, of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations and this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.3.

On or before December 31, 2026, the director shall adopt regulations to revise Sections 6690 to 6692, inclusive, of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations to additionally apply those provisions to private schools serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with an enrollment of six or more pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.4.

(a) The department and the county agricultural commissioners shall use private school directory information and maps available on the internet website of the State Department of Education to determine the location of private schools serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with an enrollment of six or more pupils.

(b) An operator of property or applicator who uses the information or maps described in subdivision (a) for purposes of complying with the requirements of this chapter, or the regulations implementing this chapter, shall not be considered in violation of those requirements if the information or maps used by the operator or
 applicator were inaccurate or out of date and the operator’s or applicator’s actions that would otherwise be considered in violation of those requirements are solely the result of using the inaccurate or out-of-date information or maps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.5.

This article does not apply to a school conducted in a person’s residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13189.6.

This article does not restrict the department’s authority to amend Sections 6690 to 6692, inclusive, of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations to the extent that those amendments are consistent with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Contamination of Compost [13190. - 13192.]

13190.

(a) “Clopyralid” means 3,6-dichloro-2-pyridinecarboxylic acid.

(b) “Compost” means the product resulting from the controlled biological decomposition of organic wastes that are source separated from the municipal solid waste stream, or that are separated at a centralized facility.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(d) “Herbicide” means a pesticide, as defined in Section 12753, that is intended to kill weeds.

(e) “Lawn and turf use” means a residential or nonresidential use of an herbicide on lawn and turf, including, but not limited to, lawn and turf located at schools, parks, office buildings and golf courses. Lawn and turf use does not include use of an herbicide on lawn and turf located in turf farms, uncultivated open space, agricultural rangeland or cultivated farmland.
